Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 17 Enforcement of Judgments

Cross references. —

As to judgments generally, see chapter 16 of this title.

As to relief from judgment, see Rule 60, W.R.C.P.

Property at execution sale to be adequately described. —

In an execution sale, the sheriff has the obligation to meet the requirement that the property to be sold must be adequately described and specifically identified or pointed out to the bidders. Eggeman v. Western Nat'l Bank, 596 P.2d 318,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 417

(Wyo. 1979).

Sheriff subject to amercement. —

In an execution sale the actions of the sheriff are circumscribed by statutes and he is subject to amercement. Eggeman v. Western Nat'l Bank, 596 P.2d 318,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 417

(Wyo. 1979).

Cited

in

Albrecht v. Zwaanshoek Holding En Financiering, B.V., 816 P.2d 808,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1991).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

30 Am. Jur. 2d Executions and Enforcement of Judgments §§ 61 to 112; 46 Am. Jur. 2d Judgments §§ 897 to 914.

Part payment or promise to pay judgment as affecting time for execution, 45 ALR2d 967.

Recovery of damages for mental anguish, distress, suffering, or the like, in action for wrongful attachment, garnishment, sequestration or execution, 83 ALR3d 598.

Judgment of court of foreign country as entitled to enforcement or extra-territorial effect in state court, 13 ALR4th 1109.

Validity, construction and effect of body execution statutes allowing imprisonment based on judgment, debt or the like — modern cases, 79 ALR4th 232.

33 C.J.S. Executions §§ 100 to 136; 50 C.J.S. Judgments §§ 693 to 696.